North Carolina, session 2025, SB614.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-215.31(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) The owner of a dam classified by the Department as a high-hazard dam or an
intermediate-hazard dam shall develop an Emergency Action Plan for the dam as provided in this
subsection:
(1) The owner of the dam shall submit a proposed Emergency Action Plan for the
dam within 90 days after the dam is classified as a high-hazard dam or an
intermediate-hazard dam to the Department and the Department of Public
Safety for their review and approval. The Department and the Department of
Public Safety shall approve the Emergency Action Plan if they determine that
it complies with the requirements of this subsection and will protect public
health, safety, and welfare; the environment; and natural resources.
(2) The Emergency Action Plan shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:
a. A description of potential emergency conditions that could occur at
the dam, including security risks.
b. A description of actions to be taken in response to an emergency
condition at the dam.
c. Emergency notification procedures to aid in warning and evacuations
during an emergency condition at the dam.
d. A downstream inundation map depicting areas affected by a dam
failure and sudden release of the impoundment. A downstream
inundation map prepared pursuant to this section does not require
preparation by a licensed professional engineer or a person under the
responsible charge of a licensed professional engineer unless the dam
is associated with a coal combustion residuals surface impoundment,
as defined by G.S. 130A-309.201.The requirement to prepare a
downstream inundation map as part of an Emergency Action Plan does
not apply to a dam that is less than 15 feet in height or that has an
impoundment capacity of less than 50 acre-feet, unless the
Commission finds the Department has demonstrated that site-specific
factors warrant the inclusion of a downstream inundation map in the
Emergency Action Plan.
*S614-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2a) A downstream inundation map prepared as part of an Emergency Action Plan
under subdivision (2) of this section does not require preparation by a licensed
professional engineer or a person under the responsible charge of a licensed
professional engineer unless the dam is associated with a coal combustion
residuals surface impoundment, as defined by G.S. 130A-309.201.
(3) The owner of the dam shall update the Emergency Action Plan annually and
shall submit it to the Department and the Department of Public Safety for their
review and approval within one year of the prior approval.
(4) The Department shall provide a copy of the Emergency Action Plan to the
regional offices of the Department that might respond to an emergency
condition at the dam.
(5) The Department of Public Safety shall provide a copy of the Emergency
Action Plan to all local emergency management agencies that might respond
to an emergency condition at the dam.
(6) Information included in an Emergency Action Plan that constitutes sensitive
public security information, as provided in G.S. 132-1.7, shall be maintained
as confidential information and shall not be subject to disclosure under the
Public Records Act. For purposes of this section, "sensitive public security
information" shall include Critical Energy Infrastructure Information
protected from disclosure under rules adopted by the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission in 18 C.F.R. § 388.112."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to Emergency
Action Plans required to be submitted or updated on or after that date.
Page 2 Senate Bill 614-First Edition